California, session 20252026, AB1769.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) As used in this section, “public postsecondary educational institution” and “TCU” have the same meanings as defined in Section 66728 of the Education Code.(b) The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:(1) Effective transfer programs provide a clear path for obtaining the preparation necessary for upper division coursework and graduation at a four-year college or university.(2) The California State University, the California Community Colleges, and the University of California have made significant progress in developing articulation agreements that specify required coursework and other academic preparation necessary for transfer students to succeed at a four-year public postsecondary educational institution.(c) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this act to facilitate articulation and seamless transfer pathways for students attending TCUs to public postsecondary educational institutions. The goal of developing and implementing transfer agreement and articulation programs, as described in Article 1.7 (commencing with Section 66728) of Chapter 9.2 of Part 40 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code, is to ensure that students attending TCUs can earn certificates and degrees that allow them greater job-earning potential in the workforce, and to ensure the effective and efficient progression of students attending TCUs when they transfer to public postsecondary educational institutions, in order to minimize duplication of coursework.SEC. 2. Article 1.7 (commencing with Section 66728) is added to Chapter 9.2 of Part 40 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code, to read: Article 1.7. Student Transfer Pathways: California Tribal Colleges and Universities66728. (a) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Public postsecondary educational institution” means a campus of the California State University, the California Community Colleges that offers a baccalaureate degree, or the University of California.(2) “TCU” means tribal colleges and universities geographically located in California that are operated by an Indian tribal government, as defined in Section 7701(a)(40) of Title 26 of the United States Code. “TCU” includes, but is not limited to, California Indian Nations College, California Tribal College, and Kumeyaay Community College.(b) (1) The Trustees of the California State University and the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall, and the Regents of the University of California are requested to, develop and implement transfer agreement and articulation programs, including, but not limited to, general education and transfer curriculum, to support and enhance the transfer of students attending TCUs to public postsecondary educational institutions.(2) In developing a transfer agreement or articulation program, the California State University and the California Community Colleges shall, and the University of California is requested to, work collaboratively with participating TCUs to identify opportunities to align coursework with the California General Education Transfer Curriculum, where appropriate.(c) A program described in subdivision (b) shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following components:(1) Enrollment and resource planning.(2) Intersegmental faculty curricular efforts.(3) Coordinated counseling.(4) Financial aid and transfer services.(5) Specific efforts to improve diversity.(6) Early outreach activities.(7) Concurrent enrollment as described in this section.(8) Support centers.(d) The Trustees of the California State University and the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall, and the Regents of the University of California are requested to, develop and implement, to the extent capacity is available, concurrent enrollment programs that allow students attending TCUs to enroll in courses offered at public postsecondary educational institutions for purposes of expanding opportunities for students attending TCUs to potentially transfer to public postsecondary educational institutions.(e) (1) In implementing this section, the California State University and the California Community Colleges shall, and the University of California is requested to, in consultation with other involved entities faculty and other institutional representatives, as appropriate, assess tools, systems, or curricula designed to facilitate student transfer for purposes of building upon those that are most effective in communicating articulation for students attending TCUs.(2) Tools, systems, or curricula described in this subdivision shall include, but not be limited to, the California Articulation Number system, the Intersegmental Major Preparation Articulated Curriculum, the California General Education Transfer Curriculum, and the Articulation System Stimulating Interinstitutional Student Transfer.(f) This section does not require the University of California, the California State University, or the California Community Colleges to articulate coursework completed at a TCU that is not institutionally accredited by an accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education.